California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(11) The California Health and Human Services Agency is developing the “CalCareNet” Web site, which is designed to help the consumer find state-licensed providers of health services, social services, mental health services, alcohol and other drug services, and disability services, and also to find state-licensed care facilities.

(b) It the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to do all of the following:

(1) Ensure that each consumer is able to connect with the appropriate services necessary to meet individual needs.

(2) Better coordinate long-term care delivery, recognizing the elements that are already in place, and expand the availability of long-term care.

(3) Deliver long-term care services in the most cost-effective manner.

(4) Access multiple public and private funding streams, without supplanting existing funding for programs and services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 541, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9251.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) The term “long-term care” refers to a wide range of supportive and health and social services for older adults and adults with disabilities. Long-term care differs from other types of care in that the goal of long-term care is not to cure illnesses, but to allow individuals to attain and maintain optimal levels of functioning in their homes or in their communities. The provision of long-term services involves a continuum of health and social services in a variety of home- and community-based settings.

(b) The term “care navigation” describes any of the following services, performed in multiple settings, including, but not limited to, area agencies on aging, hospitals, caregiver resource centers, independent living centers, and senior centers:

(1) Consumer information delivered over the Internet, by telephone, including a statewide information hotline, or in person.

(2) Referral to programs or services delivered over the Internet, by telephone, including a statewide information telephone hotline, or in person.

(3) Short-term assistance for the consumer or caregiver, provided by persons qualified to work with the consumer to define needs, to refer the consumer to services that are free of charge or that may be purchased by the consumer, and to develop a plan of coordinated care.

(4) Recognition of the need for ongoing assistance, with the ability to link consumers to ongoing assistance, care coordination, services coordination, or case management.

(c) (1) The term “care navigator” describes an individual who provides care navigation to older persons or persons with disabilities in need of long-term care services, or to caregivers. Care navigators consider an individual’s medical and functional needs, financial resources, and social support, in order to partner with the individual and, together, determine which services offered in the community are most appropriate for the consumer. The intervention with the consumer may be limited, depending on the consumer’s needs.

(2) Care navigation may be performed within existing programs and at multiple points of entry, including, but not limited to, area agencies on aging, independent living centers, county welfare departments, hospitals, caregiver resource centers, and senior centers.

(d) The term “CalCareNet” describes a self-directed statewide, Internet-based application using the State of California Internet portal to link local Internet information systems. The CalCareNet Web site is designed to help the consumer find state-licensed providers of health services, social services, mental health services, alcohol and other drug services, and disability services, and also to find state-licensed care facilities. The purpose of CalCareNet is to enable the consumer to better navigate the long-term care system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 541, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9252.

Implementation of this chapter shall be grounded on the following principles:

(a) Services shall be provided in the least restrictive, most home-based environment compatible with the health condition, mental status, and long-term needs of each consumer.

(b) Services shall be accessible through multiple points of entry into a continuum of long-term care services that meet a wide range of needs of the aging population and for persons with disabilities.

(c) Home- and community-based long-term care services shall be readily accessible from the hospital.

(d) Home- and community-based long-term care services that meet a wide range of consumer needs shall be available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 541, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9253.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Providers of long-term care programs, including, but not limited to, programs of all-inclusive care for the elderly, skilled nursing facilities, adult day care, adult day services, Alzheimer’s day care centers, and multipurpose senior services programs, are regulated by numerous state and local agencies.

(2) Overlapping and duplicative oversight of long-term care programs often results in conflicting interpretations of statutes and regulations. Also, oversight by multiple agencies creates an operational burden that ultimately deprives residents or clients of valuable staff time.

(3) The State Auditor has completed an audit investigation of the duplicative overlapping regulatory oversight of long-term care programs.

(b) By March 1, 2005, the California Health and Human Services Agency shall determine the appropriate single entity to provide oversight of the waiver standards for adult day health care centers.

(c) The State Department of Health Services shall determine a percentage of the number of oversight reviews it conducts of the Multipurpose Senior Services Program (MSSP) utilization surveys that are conducted by the California Department of Aging. The percentage of surveys reviewed shall be sufficient to ensure effective oversight, but small enough to avoid unnecessary duplication of effort.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 455, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

9254.

(a) By January 1, 2005, the agency, with recommendations from the Long-Term Care Council, shall set standards for CalCareNet, with the goal of creating an Internet site that links to counties and planning service areas, and that provides information on long-term care services that are available to the consumer. The agency shall recommend guidelines for local Internet information systems, allowing for flexibility in design and structure. The local entities with existing systems are encouraged to maintain existing systems, assuming CalCareNet guidelines are met.

(b) State funds shall not be appropriated for purposes of this section. The agency is not required to undertake any new task described in this section unless it receives federal or private funds for that purpose.

(c) Information shared between, and tracked by, providers through CalCareNet may in no way violate Section 15633, pertaining to client confidentiality, or any other statute requiring that client information be kept confidential, unless otherwise exempted by law.

(d) In crafting its guidelines for the local-level information systems, the Long-Term Care Council shall seek input from interested stakeholders, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Consumers.

(2) Consumer advocacy organizations.

(3) Area agencies on aging.

(4) Senior legal services.

(5) The California Commission on Aging.

(6) Caregiver resource centers.

(7) Veterans’ services.

(8) Senior centers.

(9) PACE (Program for All Inclusive Care for the Elderly).

(10) The Senior Care Action Network (SCAN).

(11) The Multipurpose Senior Services Program (MSSP) services.

(12) Ombudspersons.

(13) County-level programs, including, but not limited to, In-Home Supportive Services (IHSS), county welfare departments, public health departments, and adult protective services agencies.

(14) Programs for persons with disabilities, including, but not limited to, independent living centers.

(15) Other social service programs, including, but not limited to, employment development programs.

(e) By January 1, 2004, the agency shall link the CalCareNet Web site to local Internet information systems. The agency shall permit counties and planning service areas to design local information systems, contingent upon the availability of funding and resources for these purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 541, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9255.

(a) By January 1, 2004, the agency, based on recommendations from the Long-Term Care Council, shall recommend to the Legislature standards for care navigation, including suggestions for connecting consumers from the acute care system, to and through the long-term care system.(b) In its recommendations to the Legislature, the agency shall address care navigator educational and training requirements, the care navigator location within the long-term care continuum, licensure and oversight requirements, and potential funding impact. In its recommendations, the agency shall discuss the need for waivers, enhancing access to home- and community-based services for private payers, connecting the acute care system with the long-term care system, and obtaining private and public funding. The agency shall also discuss means for the cooperative participation of insurance companies, physicians, hospitals, assisted living facilities, home health agencies, and skilled nursing facilities.

(c) In crafting its recommendations to the agency, the Long-Term Care Council shall seek input from interested stakeholders, including, but not limited to, those stakeholders described in subdivision (d) of Section 9254.

(d) Care navigation must be consistent with the goal of developing a program that is based on the existing state and local systems, to ensure that consumers are connected to the necessary care and services.

(e) State funds shall not be appropriated for the purpose of implementing this section. The agency is not required to undertake any new task specified in this section unless it receives federal or private funds for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 541, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9256.

The implementation of a care navigation program, as described in Section 9255, shall be subject to the enactment of legislation requiring implementation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 541, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.6. Office of the Long-Term Care Patient Representative [9260. - 9295.]

9260.

(a) (1) The Long-Term Care Patient Representative Program is established within the California Department of Aging to provide public patient representatives for residents of skilled nursing or intermediate care facilities to participate in interdisciplinary team reviews held pursuant to Section 1418.8 of the Health and Safety Code in the event that a family member, friend, or other person authorized by state or federal law cannot be located, or is otherwise unavailable, unwilling, or unable to participate as a patient representative.

(2) The Office of the Long-Term Care Patient Representative is established within the California Department of Aging to coordinate and oversee the statewide provision of public patient
 representative services and to train and certify individuals who serve as public patient representatives in the Long-Term Care Patient Representative Program.

(b) The department may enter into agreements with area agencies on aging, government agencies, or nonprofit organizations to provide patient representative services as local long-term care patient representative programs (“local program”). Contracts between the department and local programs shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(c) The department shall provide every skilled nursing facility and intermediate care facility, and update as needed, contact information for local programs to be used for required notices.

(d) The department shall collect, analyze, and report data related to
 the program, including the number of residents represented and the number of interdisciplinary team meetings attended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 21.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

9265.

(a) The department shall establish appropriate eligibility, training, certification, and continuing education requirements for public patient representatives. An individual shall not serve as a public patient representative until and unless the individual obtains and maintains certification pursuant to this section.

(b) Each public patient representative shall obtain a criminal offender record clearance prior to entry into any skilled nursing facility or intermediate care facility.

(c) The certification process shall ensure that each public patient representative is not prohibited from serving as a patient representative by Section 1418.8 of the Health and Safety
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 21.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

9270.

(a) A public patient representative shall not participate in an interdisciplinary team review of a decision that would directly and inexorably lead to death.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a public patient representative may participate in an interdisciplinary team review to create or revise Physician Orders for Life Sustaining Treatment, as specified in Part 4 (commencing with Section 4780) of Division 4.7 of the Probate Code, Do Not Resuscitate, comfort care orders, and elections of hospice care. The public patient representative shall ascertain whether that care is consistent with the resident’s individual health care instructions, if any, and other expressed wishes, to the extent known, or otherwise whether the proposed
 intervention appears consistent with the best interest of the resident.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 21.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

9275.

A public patient representative assigned by the program to an interdisciplinary team review shall do all of the following:

(a) Conduct a review to confirm that all criteria are met for an interdisciplinary team to convene for a resident and for the assignment of a patient representative by the program, as required by Section 1418.8 of the Health and Safety Code, including reviewing a copy of all written notices from the facility to the resident regarding the physician’s determination that the resident lacks the ability to provide informed consent, and the facility’s determination that there is no surrogate decisionmaker.

(b) Meet and, if possible, interview the resident prior to an interdisciplinary
 team meeting for initial review of a proposed treatment intervention or quarterly review of that intervention, or upon a change of condition in the resident necessitating a change in the proposed intervention.

(c) Review the medical and clinical records of the resident.

(d) Review relevant policies and procedures of the facility.

(e) Participate in the interdisciplinary team review of the proposed intervention, considering the factors required by Section 1418.8 of the Health and Safety Code, including the risks and benefits of the proposed intervention, and any alternatives, and consider whether the proposed intervention is either consistent with the resident’s preferences or best approximation of preferences, if known, or otherwise whether the proposed intervention appears consistent with the best interests of the
 resident.

(f) Articulate the resident’s preferences, if known, or best approximation of preferences.

(g) Identify and report any concerns regarding abuse and neglect of the resident to the Office of the Long-Term Care Ombudsman, the State Department of Public Health, and other appropriate organizations or agencies.

(h) Refer a resident who seeks judicial review pursuant to Section 1418.8 of the Health and Safety Code to appropriate legal services identified by the program. Public patient representatives and the program shall not provide legal representation or advice to residents.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 21.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

9280.

Upon request of the department, the Attorney General shall represent the department, local programs, and the program’s representatives in litigation concerning affairs of the program, unless the Attorney General represents another state agency, in which case the agency or the department shall employ other counsel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 21.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

9285.

Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement this chapter or Section 1418.8 of the Health and Safety Code, in whole or in part, by means of a program memo or other similar instruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 21.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

9290.

(a) The State of California, the California Department of Aging, local programs, and any employee or representative of the program shall not be held liable for civil damages on the account of any harm, injury, or death resulting from any act or omission by the state, department, program, or its employees or representatives in good faith performance of the duties and responsibilities under this chapter.

(b) All communications by employees or representatives of the State of California, the California Department of Aging, and local programs, if reasonably related to the duties and responsibilities under this chapter and done in good faith, shall be privileged, and that privilege shall serve as a defense to any action in libel or
 slander.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 21.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

9295.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the department is not required to begin providing public patient representatives pursuant to this chapter until July 1, 2022, or the date that the Director of the California Department of Aging certifies to the State Public Health Officer and provides public notice that the Long-Term Care Patient Representative Program is operational, whichever is earlier.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 21.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. California Senior Legislature [9300. - 9305.]

9300.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the needs of senior citizens for public programs in health, social services, recreation, transportation, education, housing, cultural services, and other appropriate areas of service can best be assessed by senior citizens.

(b) The Legislature also finds and declares that the California Senior Legislature, having been in continuous service since first provided for in 1980, and since its first session in 1981, and having proved its usefulness in providing model legislation for older citizens and advocating for the needs of seniors, shall be established through this chapter and shall operate according to the procedures set forth in this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9301.

(a) The California Senior Legislature shall be composed of two houses, the California Senior Senate, composed of 40 members, and the California Senior Assembly, composed of 80 members.

(b) Members of the California Senior Legislature shall serve two-year terms.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), members elected or appointed to the California Senior Legislature on or after January 1, 2006, shall serve four-year terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 633, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2006, or sooner, as prescribed by Sec. 9 of Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

9302.

The members of the California Senior Legislature shall be elected or appointed, in all 33 planning and service areas in California, according to rules developed by the California Senior Legislature in cooperation with the California Association of Area Agencies on Aging.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 633, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2006, or sooner, as prescribed by Sec. 9 of Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

9304.

The California Senior Legislature shall have the full authority to define its program and utilize its funds in any way necessary to carry out the duties of this chapter, provided that no such program or activity is in violation of state law or regulation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9304.5.

(a) The California Senior Legislature shall enter into a mutually agreed-upon interagency agreement with a state entity to carry out administrative duties related to its program.

(b) The California Senior Legislature shall identify the state entity for purposes of subdivision (a) by May 1, 2005, in order to meet the budget proposal cycle to achieve a transition of responsibilities in the 2006–07 fiscal year.

(c) This section does not preclude the California Senior Legislature from entering into mutually agreed-upon interagency agreements for any subsequent fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 633, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2006, or sooner, as prescribed by Sec. 9 of Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

9305.

(a) The funds for the California Senior Legislature shall be allocated from the California Senior Legislature Fund or from private funds directed to the Legislature for the purpose of funding activities of the California Senior Legislature.

(b) The California Senior Legislature may accept gifts and grants from any source, public or private, to help perform its functions, pursuant to Section 9304.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 20, Sec. 15.   (SB 79)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.3. Senior Legal Services [9320. - 9320.]

9320.

(a) The department shall establish a task force to study and make recommendations, including action steps and timelines, on the improvement of legal services delivery to older adults in California by exploring the following matters:

(1) Actions to ensure that all area agencies on aging allocate sufficient funding to local legal assistance providers. Actions may include, but not be limited to, the establishment of a minimum percentage of area agency on aging funding for legal assistance providers in California.

(2) Ways to ensure uniformity in the provision of legal services throughout the state, including, but not limited to, possible development of uniform statewide standards for the delivery of legal
 services in California.

(3) Measures to evaluate and monitor local legal assistance programs to ensure compliance with the federal Older Americans Act and its implementing regulations.

(4) Establishment of statewide reporting system to assess the effectiveness of a legal assistance program for older adults in the state.

(5) The possible establishment of a statewide legal hotline for older adults.

(6) Opportunities to enhance communications among the various service providers and to ensure efficient service delivery involving local programs and a statewide hotline, should it come into existence.

(7) Opportunities for joint training for legal older adult services advocates around the
 state.

(8) Other states’ legal services delivery networks.

(b) The director shall serve on or appoint a representative to the task force, and shall appoint the following additional members:

(1) One member of the Legislature or their representative.

(2) Three legal service director representatives of existing legal service programs for older adults.

(3) The Legal Services Developer at the California Department of Aging.

(4) Two area agency on aging directors.

(5) Two representatives of older adult advocacy organizations.

(6) A representative of the State Bar of California.

(c) The Member of the Legislature, or their representative, shall serve on the task force to the extent that the service is compatible with the duties of a Member of the Legislature.

(d) The task force shall report and make its recommendations to the Legislature on or before September 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 18.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. Home Modifications for Seniors [9450. - 9460.]

9450.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Thousands of California seniors are living with mobility and health problems and these numbers will increase as the state’s population ages. Statistics show that 50 percent of people over the age of 80 years are disabled in some manner.

(2) Most housing was not designed for people who are disabled, have lost strength, flexibility, or balance through aging, and who necessarily have become fearful or extremely cautious in their daily activities to avoid injury. Front steps, staircases, narrow doorways, low electric sockets, low light levels, round door handles, high kitchen cabinets, and bathrooms without grab bars or moveable shower heads pose hazards for the elderly. One in three Americans over the age of 65 years suffers a fall each year, often in the home, which can cause serious injury and depression.

(3) Studies show that basic home modifications to improve safety and make it easier to maneuver about the home can forestall hospitalization and nursing home care as seniors grow more fragile. “Aging in place” is a new concept that can result in less injury, retaining elders in their homes, and offers a significant cost savings to health care insurers, families, and public agencies.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the development of the “aging in place” concept be recognized and supported by the state, that funding for education and making home improvements be facilitated through public and private sources, and that recommendations for changes in home modification policies and information for home modification projects and products be developed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 797, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9451.

The department, in consultation with the commission, shall enter into a contract for the development of information and materials which shall be used to educate Californians on the concept of “aging in place” and the benefits of home modification. The contractor shall be a research-based university gerontology department with extensive experience and work with the concept of “aging in place” and the benefits of home modification.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 797, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9452.

The department shall distribute the information developed pursuant to Section 9451 to each area agency on aging and to other appropriate entities throughout the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 797, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9453.

The department, in cooperation with the entity contracting with the department pursuant to Section 9451, shall sponsor regional training sessions, and seminars, using the materials developed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 797, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9454.

Implementation of this chapter shall be subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 797, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9460.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, an area agency on aging or a county, or both, may establish an aging multidisciplinary personnel team with the goal of facilitating the expedited identification, assessment, and linkage of older adults to services and to allow provider agencies and members of the personnel team to share confidential information for the purpose of coordinating services.

(2) If a city within the service area of an area agency on aging or a county that has established an aging multidisciplinary personnel team pursuant to this section requests to participate in that team, participation of appropriate city personnel shall be allowed, as determined by the area agency
 on aging or county, unless the area agency on aging or county determines that participation by the city would hinder compliance with the requirements and obligations set forth in this section or would otherwise conflict with the goals and objectives of the area agency on aging or county.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Aging multidisciplinary personnel team” means any team of two or more persons who are trained in and who are qualified to provide a broad range of services related to older adults. The team may include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Mental health and substance use disorder services personnel and practitioners or
 other trained counseling personnel.

(B) Police officers, probation officers, or other law enforcement agents.

(C) Legal counsel for the older adult.

(D) Medical personnel with sufficient training to provide health services.

(E) Social services workers with experience or training in the eligibility for and provision of services to older adults.

(F) Case managers or case coordinators responsible for referral, linkage, or coordination of care and services provided to older adults.

(G) Veterans services providers and counselors.

(H) Domestic violence victim service organizations, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code.

(I) A member of a multidisciplinary team, as defined in Sections 9401, 15610.55, 18999.8, or 18999.81.

(J) Aging services provider agencies and designated personnel, including individuals with area agencies on aging.

(K) A representative from the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman.

(2) “Aging service provider agency” means any governmental or other agency that has, as one of its purposes, the identification, assessment, and linkage of services to older adults. The aging services
 provider agencies serving older adults that may share information under this section include, but are not limited to, all of the following entities or service agencies:

(A) Social services.

(B) Health services.

(C) Mental health services.

(D) Substance use disorder services.

(E) Probation.

(F) Law enforcement.

(G) Legal counsel for the adult.

(H) Veterans services and counseling.

(I) Domestic violence victim service organizations, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code.

(J) A member of a multidisciplinary team, as defined in Sections 9401, 15610.55, 18999.8, or 18999.81.

(K) Caregivers.

(L) Housing.

(M) Long-term care ombudsperson.

(3) “Older adult” means a person of 60 years of age or older.

(c) (1) Members of an aging multidisciplinary personnel team engaged in the identification, assessment, and linkage of services to older adults may disclose to, and
 exchange with, one another, information and writings that relate to any information that may be designated as confidential under state law if the member of the team reasonably believes it is generally relevant to the identification of or the provision of services. Any discussion relative to the disclosure or exchange of the information or writings during a team meeting is confidential and, notwithstanding any other law, testimony concerning that discussion is not admissible in any criminal, civil, or juvenile court proceeding.

(2) Disclosure and exchange of information pursuant to this section may occur telephonically and electronically if there is adequate verification of the identity of the aging multidisciplinary personnel who are involved in that disclosure or exchange of information.

(3) Disclosure and exchange of information pursuant to this section shall not be made to anyone other than members of the aging multidisciplinary personnel team, and those qualified to receive information as set forth in subdivision (d).

(4) Representatives of domestic violence victim service organizations, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code, shall obtain an individual’s informed consent, in accordance with all applicable state and federal confidentiality laws, before disclosing confidential information about that individual to another team member as specified in this section.

(d) The aging multidisciplinary personnel team may designate persons qualified pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) to be a member of the team for a particular case.
 A person designated as a team member pursuant to this subdivision may receive and disclose relevant information and records, subject to the confidentiality provisions of subdivision (f).

(e) (1) The sharing of information permitted under subdivision (c) shall be governed by protocols developed by each area agency on aging or county that establishes an aging multidisciplinary personnel team. The protocols shall describe how and what information may be shared by the aging multidisciplinary personnel team to ensure that confidential information gathered by the team is not disclosed in violation of state or federal law. A copy of the protocols shall be distributed to each participating agency and to persons in those agencies who participate in the aging multidisciplinary personnel team. Each aging multidisciplinary personnel
 team shall post the protocols on the internet website on the homepage of the area agency on aging or county’s office of aging within 30 days of adoption. Each area agency on aging or county shall provide a copy of its protocols to the California Department of Aging. This subdivision shall not be construed to require the department to review or approve any aging multidisciplinary personnel team protocols that it receives.

(2) A protocol developed by an area agency on aging or a county pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The items of information or data elements that will be shared.

(B) The participating agencies.

(C) A description of how the information shared pursuant to this section will be used by the aging multidisciplinary personnel team only for the intended purposes specified in subdivision (a).

(D) The information retention schedule that participating agencies shall follow.

(E) A requirement that no confidential information or writings be disclosed to persons who are not members of the aging multidisciplinary personnel team, except to the extent required or permitted under applicable law.

(F) A requirement that participating agencies develop uniform written policies and procedures that include security and privacy compliance training for employee access to information pursuant to this protocol.

(G) A requirement that all persons who have access to information shared by participating agencies sign a confidentiality statement that includes, at a minimum, general use, security safeguards, acceptable use, and enforcement policies.

(H) A requirement that participating agencies employ security controls that meet applicable federal and state standards, including reasonable administrative, technical, and physical safeguards to ensure data confidentiality, integrity, and availability and to prevent unauthorized or inappropriate access, use, or disclosure.

(I) A requirement that participating agencies take reasonable steps to ensure information is complete, accurate, and up to date to the extent necessary for the agency’s
 intended purposes and that the information has not been altered or destroyed in an unauthorized manner.

(J) A requirement that, unless otherwise permitted by law, an area agency on aging or a county that establishes an aging multidisciplinary personnel team obtain the affirmative consent of an individual or their representative before the individual’s information may be shared.

(K) A requirement that, unless otherwise permitted by law, an area agency on aging or a county that establishes an aging multidisciplinary personnel team notify an individual that the individual’s information may be shared for the purposes of the identification of or the provision of services once affirmative consent is obtained and that the individual may opt out of sharing
 information under this section at any time. The notice shall inform the individual that refusal to consent to the sharing of information or deciding to opt out of sharing information under this section does not affect their eligibility for services.

(f) Every member of the aging multidisciplinary personnel team who receives information or records regarding adults and families in that member’s capacity as a member of the team shall be under the same privacy and confidentiality obligations and subject to the same confidentiality penalties as the person disclosing or providing the information or records. The information or records obtained shall be maintained in a manner that ensures the maximum protection of privacy and confidentiality rights.

(g) This section shall not
 be construed to restrict guarantees of confidentiality provided under state or federal law.

(h) Information and records communicated or provided to the team members by all providers and agencies shall be deemed private and confidential and shall be protected from discovery and disclosure by all applicable statutory and common law protections. Existing civil and criminal penalties shall apply to the inappropriate disclosure of information held by the team members.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 9450 (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 621, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 135.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Area Agencies on Aging and Advisory Councils [9400. - 9404.]

9400.

(a) The Legislature hereby declares and recognizes the area agencies on aging to be the local units on aging in California that are supported from an array of sources, including federal funding largely through the federal Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 et seq.), state and local governmental assistance, the private sector, and individual contributions for services.

(b) Area agencies on aging shall operate in compliance with the Older Americans Act and applicable regulations.

(c) Each area agency on aging shall maintain a professional staff that is supplemented by volunteers, governed by a board of directors or elected officials, and whose activities are reviewed by an advisory council
 consisting primarily of older individuals from the community.
